Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
REGISTRATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF CONDOMINIUMS

Note

Part heading amended by L 2005, c 93, pt of §3.

[§514B-51] Registration required;
exceptions. (a) A developer may not offer for sale any units in a project
unless the project is registered with the commission and an effective date for
the developer's public report is issued by the commission.

(b) The registration requirement of this
section shall not apply to:

(1) The disposition of units exempted from the
developer's public report requirements pursuant to section 514B‑81(b);

(2) Projects in which all units are restricted to
nonresidential uses and all units are to be sold for $1,000,000 or more; or

(3) The sale of units in bulk, such as where a
developer undertakes to develop and then sells all or a portion of the
developer's entire inventory of units to a purchaser who is a developer. The
registration requirements of this section and the developer's amended
developer's public report requirements of section 514B‑56 shall apply to
any sale of units to the public following a sale of units in bulk. [L 2005, c
93, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next